Nevada, session 83, SB347.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 433A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An officer authorized to make arrests in the State of
Nevada may immediately confiscate any firearm found to be on
the person or in the immediate vicinity of a person placed on a
mental health crisis hold pursuant to NRS 433A.160.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. If an officer confiscates a firearm from a person placed on
a mental health crisis hold pursuant to subsection 1, the officer
shall immediately provide the person with:
(a) A receipt which includes a description of the firearm; and
(b) A notice describing the procedures set forth in this section
for the return of the firearm.
3. Upon the release of the person from treatment, the law
enforcement agency retaining custody of the confiscated firearm
shall make the firearm available for return to the person unless:
(a) An officer of the law enforcement agency files a verified
application for an order for protection against high-risk behavior
pursuant to NRS 33.560; or
(b) The person is prohibited from owning, possessing or
having under his or her custody or control any firearm pursuant
to NRS 202.360.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)